Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1323
Transfer or cause to be transferred any sounds recorded on a phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, or film; unlawful; exemption.

Unless exempt under section 28-1325, it is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or association knowingly to (1) transfer or cause to be transferred any sounds recorded on a phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film, or other article on which sounds are recorded onto any other phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film, or other article or (2) sell, distribute, circulate, offer for sale, distribution or circulation, possess for the purpose of sale, distribution, or circulation, or cause to be sold, distributed, or circulated, offered for sale, distribution, or circulation, or possessed for sale, distribution, or circulation any article or device on which sounds have been transferred without the consent of the person who owns the master phonograph record, master disc, master tape, master wire, master film, or other article from which the sounds are derived.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 307;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 185.